Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 7. Partner's Dissociation when Business not Wound Up

§ 17-21-701.
Purchase of dissociated partner's interest.

If a partner is dissociated from a partnership without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under W.S.

17-21-801

, the partnership shall cause the dissociated partner’s interest in the partnership to be purchased for a buyout price determined pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The buyout price of a dissociated partner’s interest is the amount that would have been distributable to the dissociating partner under W.S. 17-21-808(b) if, on the date of dissociation, the assets of the partnership were sold at a price equal to the greater of the liquidation value or the value based on a sale of the entire business as a going concern without the dissociated partner and the partnership were wound up as of that date. In either case, the sale price of the partnership assets shall be determined on the basis of the amount that would be paid by a willing buyer to a willing seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or sell, and with knowledge of all relevant facts. Interest shall be paid from the date of dissociation to the date of payment.

Damages for wrongful dissociation under W.S. 17-21-602(b) and all other amounts owing, whether or not presently due, from the dissociated partner to the partnership, shall be offset against the buyout price. Interest shall be paid from the date the amount owed becomes due to the date of payment.

A partnership shall indemnify a dissociated partner against all partnership liabilities incurred before the dissociation, except liabilities then unknown to the partnership, and against all partnership liabilities incurred after the dissociation, except liabilities incurred by an act of the dissociated partner under W.S.

17-21-702

. For purposes of this subsection, a liability not known to a partner other than the dissociated partner is not known to the partnership.

If no agreement for the purchase of a dissociated partner’s interest is reached within one hundred twenty (120) days after a written demand for payment, the partnership shall pay or cause to be paid in cash to the dissociated partner the amount the partnership estimates to be the buyout price and accrued interest, reduced by any offsets and accrued interest under subsection (c) of this section.

If a deferred payment is authorized under subsection (h) of this section, the partnership may tender a written offer to pay the amount it estimates to be the buyout price and accrued interest, reduced by any offsets under subsection (c) of this section, stating the time of payment, the amount and type of security for payment and the other terms and conditions of the obligation.

The payment or tender required by subsection (e) or (f) of this section shall be accompanied by the following:

A statement of partnership assets and liabilities as of the date of dissociation;

The latest available partnership balance sheet and income statement, if any;

An explanation of how the estimated amount of the payment was calculated; and

Written notice that the payment is in full satisfaction of the obligation to purchase unless, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the written notice, the dissociated partner commences an action to determine the buyout price, any offsets under subsection (c) of this section or other terms of the purchase obligation.

A partner who wrongfully dissociates before the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking is not entitled to payment of any portion of the buyout price until the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, unless the partner establishes to the satisfaction of the court that earlier payment will not cause undue hardship to the business of the partnership. A deferred payment shall be adequately secured and bear interest.

A dissociated partner may maintain an action against the partnership pursuant to W.S. 17-21-406(b)(ii)(B), to determine the buyout price of that partner’s interest, any offsets under subsection (c) of this section or other terms of the purchase obligation. The action shall be commenced within one hundred twenty (120) days after the partnership has tendered payment or an offer to pay or within one (1) year after written demand for payment if no payment or offer to pay is tendered. The court shall determine the buyout price of the dissociated partner’s interest, any offset due under subsection (c) of this section and accrued interest, and enter judgment for any additional payment or refund. If deferred payment is authorized under subsection (h) of this section, the court shall also determine the security for payment and other terms of the obligation to purchase. The court may assess reasonable attorney’s fees and the fees and expenses of appraisers or other experts for a party to the action, in amounts the court finds equitable, against any other party, if the court finds that the other party acted arbitrarily, vexatiously or not in good faith, including the partnership’s failure to tender payment or an offer to pay or to comply with the requirements of subsection (g) of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Liquidation value. —

According to the Wyoming Supreme Court, the meaning of liquidation value in subsection (b) of this section is best understood by comparing it to the other method provided. When contrasted with ‘going concern value’ it is clear that ‘liquidation value’ simply means the sale of the separate assets rather than the value of the business as a whole. Additionally, under either valuation method, subsection (b) directs that the sale price be determined on the basis of the amount that would be paid by a willing buyer to a willing seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or sell, and with knowledge of all relevant facts. The legislature chose to supplement the Uniform Laws version of this provision by adding this sentence, lending added significance to this language. This ‘willing buyer’ and ‘willing seller’ language does not present a novel legal concept, as it sets forth precisely what has long been the legal definition or test of ‘fair market value.’ ‘Fair market value’ is generally defined as the amount at which property would change hands between a willing buyer and a willing seller, neither being under any compulsion to buy or sell and both having reasonable knowledge of the relevant facts. Warnick v. Warnick, 2006 WY 58, 133 P.3d 997,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2006).

Valuation. —

Where it is contemplated that a business will continue, it is not appropriate to assume an immediate liquidation with its attendant transactional costs and taxes. Under subsection (b) of this section, purely hypothetical costs of sale are not a required deduction in valuing partnership assets. Warnick v. Warnick, 2006 WY 58, 133 P.3d 997,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2006).

Asset valuation. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in excluding testimony from an expert appraiser concerning the hypothetical costs of the sale of partnership property, as they were not pertinent to the task of calculating the buyout price of a dissociated partner's interest under this section; ‘liquidation value’ meant fair market value, not the net value following a sale, when there was no evidence of any actual, intended, or pending sale at the time of dissociation, and the assets were not liquidated but were, instead, retained by the partnership. Warnick v. Warnick, 2006 WY 58, 133 P.3d 997,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 17-21-702.
Dissociated partner's power to bind and liability to partnership.

For two (2) years after a partner dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, the partnership, including a surviving partnership under article 9 of this chapter, is bound by an act of the dissociated partner that would have bound the partnership under W.S.

17-21-301

before dissociation only if the other party to the transaction:

Reasonably believes when entering the transaction that the dissociated partner is a partner at that time;

Does not have notice of the partner’s dissociation; and

Is not deemed to have notice under W.S. 17-21-303(e) or

17-21-704

.

A dissociated partner is liable to the partnership for any loss caused to the partnership arising from an obligation incurred by the dissociated partner after dissociation, for which the partnership is liable under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Powers of liquidating partners with respect to incurring of obligation, 60 ALR2d 826.

§ 17-21-703.
Dissociated partner's liability to other persons.

A partner’s dissociation does not of itself discharge the partner’s liability for a partnership obligation incurred before dissociation. A dissociated partner is not liable for a partnership obligation incurred after dissociation except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

A partner who dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business is personally liable as a partner to the other party on account of a partnership obligation incurred in connection with a transaction entered into by the partnership or a surviving partnership under article 9 of this chapter, within two (2) years after the partner’s dissociation, only if:

The other party to the transaction:

Reasonably believes when entering the transaction that the dissociated partner is a partner at that time;

Does not have notice of the partner’s dissociation; and

Is not deemed to have notice under W.S. 17-21-303(e) or

17-21-704

; and

The obligation is one on account of which the partner would be personally liable under W.S.

17-21-306

if the partner had not dissociated.

By agreement with the partnership creditor and the partners continuing the business, a dissociated partner may be released from liability for a partnership obligation.

A dissociated partner is released from liability for a partnership obligation if a partnership creditor, with notice of the partner’s dissociation but without the partner’s consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of a partnership obligation.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 17-21-704.
Statement of dissociation.

A dissociated partner or the partnership may file a statement of dissociation stating the name of the partnership and that the partner is dissociated from the partnership. A statement of dissociation is a limitation on the authority of a dissociated partner for the purposes of W.S. 17-21-303(d) and (e).

For purposes of W.S.

17-21-702

and 17-21-703(b), a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissociation ninety (90) days after the statement of dissociation is filed.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-705.
Continued use of partnership name.

Continued use of a partnership name, or a dissociated partner’s name as part thereof, by the partners continuing the business does not of itself make the dissociated partner liable for an obligation of the partners or the partnership continuing the business.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.